Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

As to collection and distribution of personal property by affidavit, see §

2-1-201

.

For duty of custodian to deliver will to court or executor and as to liability for failure to comply, see §

2-6-119

.

For provision that court shall restrain executors during proceedings to prove lost will, see §

2-6-207

.

As to status of executor or administrator upon revocation of probate, see §

2-6-304

.

As to penalty for administering estate without proving will or taking out letters of administration, see §

2-7-102

.

For provisions of the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act, see §

2-10-101

et seq.

As to administration of estates of missing persons, see §

2-12-101

et seq.

For constitutional provision authorizing the investment of trust funds by executors, administrators, guardians or trustees in the bonds or stocks of private corporations and other securities, see art. 3, § 38, Wyo. Const.

As to homestead exemption, see §

1-20-103

.

As to statute of frauds, see §

1-23-105

.

As to appointment of receivers by district court and as to qualifications, powers, duties, etc., of appointees, see §

1-33-101

et seq.

For authority of banks and trust companies to act as receivers, trustees, administrators, executors and guardians under the direction of the courts, see §§

13-2-101

and

13-5-101

.

For the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §

17-19-101

et seq.

For rule of civil procedure providing that the practice and the administration of estates by receivers shall be in accordance with the practice heretofore followed in the courts of Wyoming, see Rule 66, W.R.C.P.

§ 2-7-101.
Presumption of death; how estate handled.

When any person leaves his usual place of abode and is not seen or heard from by his relatives or other persons reasonably expected to hear from him for a period of seven (7) years, the person is presumed to be dead. If the person owned real or personal property in Wyoming, administration of the estate of the person may be had in the manner provided by law.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-190; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-502

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to written findings of presumed death of military personnel, see §§

1-12-401

to

1-12-403

.

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The Presumption of Death Problem in Title Examination,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 189.

See “Belief in Death of Absent Consort as a Defense to a Charge of Bigamy,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 158.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presumption of death of former spouse in favor of validity of second marriage, 14 ALR2d 7.

Proof of death in case of disappearance of insured, 26 ALR2d 1073.

Necessity and sufficiency of showing of search and inquiry by one relying on presumption of death from seven years' absence, 99 ALR2d 307.

§ 2-7-102.
Penalty for administering without proving will or taking letters of administration.

Any person, except one acting under the provisions of W.S.

2-1-201

and

2-1-202

, who administers the personal estate of any person dying after the passage of this act, or any part thereof, without proving the will of the deceased or taking out letters of administration of such personal estate, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not more than one (1) year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00) or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 78, § 26; R.S. 1931, § 115-1226; C.S. 1945, § 6-2126; W.S. 1957, § 39-366; Laws 1977, ch. 51, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

2-1-103

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1925, ch. 78, § 33, reads: “Chapter 180 of the Wyoming Compiled Statutes of 1920, and chapter 126 of the Wyoming Session Laws of 1923, and all acts and parts of acts in conflict herewith, are hereby repealed, provided, however, that this act shall not operate to release or waive or otherwise alter or affect any tax or taxes which may have accrued under the provisions of any prior act.”

Effect of conflicting 1977 legislation. —

Section 6, ch. 51, Laws 1977, reads: “If any other act of the legislature enacted during the same session in which this act is enacted is in conflict with the provisions of this act, the other act shall prevail in all cases to the extent of such conflict, regardless of whether enacted before or after the enactment of this act.”

Cited

in

George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 2-7-103.
Personal representative to take possession of estate.

The personal representative shall take possession of all of the estate of the decedent, real and personal, and collect all debts due the decedent or the estate. For the purpose of bringing suit to quiet title or for partition of the estate, the possession of the personal representative is the possession of the distributees. Possession by the distributees is subject to the possession of the personal representative for the purposes of administration as applied to this chapter.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 16, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4693; C.S. 1910, § 5561; C.S. 1920, § 6834; R.S. 1931, § 88-2501; C.S. 1945, § 6-1901; W.S. 1957, § 2-142; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-601; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter” refers to provisions enacted in the original 1890-91 Probate Code and should now read “this article.”

Avoidance of chattel mortgage. —

The administrator of a deceased mortgagor, as representing creditors of the estate, may avoid chattel mortgage because not renewed, the estate being insolvent, though claims of creditors were not filed until after suit was brought. First Nat'l Bank v. Ludvigsen, 8 Wyo. 230, 56 P. 994,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1899), rehearing denied, 8 Wyo. 230, 57 P. 934,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1899) (decided prior to adoption of Uniform Commercial Code).

Applied

in

Ashley v. Read Constr. Co., 195 F. Supp. 727, 1961 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2825 (D. Wyo. 1961).

Stated

in

Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1907).

Cited

in

Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

; Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1930); Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 86 F.2d 886,

1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3882

(10th Cir. 1939); George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of devisee or heir and duty of personal representative with respect to completion of improvements contracted for by decedent, 5 ALR2d 1250.

Power of sale conferred on executor by testator as authorizing private sale, 11 ALR2d 955.

Interlocutory mandatory injunction to obtain possession of property, 15 ALR2d 213.

Implied power of executor to sell real estate, 23 ALR2d 1000.

Right of foreign personal representative to vote stock owned by estate, 41 ALR2d 1082.

Authority of executor or administrator to make agreement to drop or compromise will contest or withdraw objection to probate, 42 A.L.R.2d 1319.

Power of executor to create easements, 44 ALR2d 573.

Instruction and effect of will authorizing or directing executor to retain investments received under will, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Kinds of property affected by will authorizing or directing executor to retain investments received under will, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Executor's conflicting interests and divided loyalty under will authorizing or directing executor to retain investments received under such instrument, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Notice by or to personal representative of exercise of option to renew lease, 51 ALR2d 1404.

Power of personal representative to repair personal property of estate, 64 ALR2d 857.

Power and standing of personal representative of deceased promisee to enforce a contract made for benefit of a third party, 76 ALR2d 231.

Power of executor with power to sell or to lease real property or to do both to give an option to purchase, 83 ALR2d 1310.

Duty of executor to locate and notify legatee or devisee, 10 ALR3d 547.

§ 2-7-104.
Actions maintainable by or against personal representatives; right generally.

Actions for the recovery of any property, real or personal, or for the possession thereof, or for the destruction, wasting, conversion, injury, taking or carrying away thereof, or to quiet title thereto, or to determine any adverse claim thereon, and all actions founded upon contract, may be maintained by and against the personal representative in all cases in which the action might have been maintained by or against their respective testators or intestates.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 16, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4694; C.S. 1910, § 5562; Laws 1919, ch. 19, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6835; R.S. 1931, § 88-2502; C.S. 1945, § 6-1902; W.S. 1957, § 2-143; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-602; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring claims to be presented prior to maintaining actions thereon, see §

2-7-717

.

For rule of civil procedure as to real party in interest, see Rule 17 (a), W.R.C.P.

When orders of probate court beyond its jurisdiction. —

The orders of the probate court for a beneficiary to show cause and to deliver to the administrator personal property, given inter vivos to the stated beneficiary by the decedent, are beyond its jurisdiction and are void. Ferriter v. Estate of Blaney, 607 P.2d 354,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1980).

Administrator's replevin action in district not probate court.—

The district court, and not the district court sitting as the probate court, is the proper forum for an administrator to bring a replevin action. Ferriter v. Estate of Blaney, 607 P.2d 354,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1980).

Section does not limit action against executor or administrator alone

for the recovery of realty. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

No action to establish resulting trust in land. —

Under this section and §

2-4-101

, an executor or administrator, as such, has no title to real estate and cannot maintain an action to establish resulting trust in land and compel a conveyance. Cook v. Elmore, 25 Wyo. 393, 171 P. 261,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1918).

Creditors may avoid mortgage. —

The provisions of this section do not deprive creditors of deceased mortgagor of right to avoid a mortgage because it could not have been avoided by decedent, if alive, as all of decedent's property is chargeable with his debts. First Nat'l Bank v. Ludvigsen, 8 Wyo. 230, 56 P. 994,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 8 Wyo. 230, 57 P. 934,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1899).

Applied

in

Parker v. Artery, 889 P.2d 520,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1995); Moncrief v. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co., 880 F. Supp. 1495, 1995 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3381 (D. Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 86 F.2d 886,

1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3882

(10th Cir. 1939); Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

; Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1930); In re Bergman, 60 Wyo. 355, 151 P.2d 360,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1944).

Quoted

in

Foster v. Wicklund, 778 P.2d 118,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attorney's delay in handling decedent's estate as ground for disciplinary action, 21 ALR4th 75.

What constitutes “legal representative” or “personal representative” entitled to receive insurance proceeds on account of loss suffered by deceased, 40 ALR4th 255.

§ 2-7-105.
Actions maintainable by or against personal representatives; actions for waste by representatives.

Personal representatives may maintain actions against any person who has wasted, destroyed, taken or carried away, or converted to his own use, the goods of their testator or intestate in his lifetime. They may also maintain actions for trespass committed on the real estate of the decedent in his lifetime.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 16, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4695; C.S. 1910, § 5563; C.S. 1920, § 6836; R.S. 1931, § 88-2503; C.S. 1945, § 6-1903; W.S. 1957, § 2-144; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-603; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-106.
Actions maintainable by or against personal representatives; actions for waste by representatives; against representatives.

Any person or his personal representative may maintain an action against the personal representative of any testator or intestate who in his lifetime has wasted, destroyed, taken or carried away, or converted to his own use, the goods or chattels of any person, or committed any trespass on the real estate of the person, provided the person claiming to be damaged by the tortious acts of the decedent files a claim for the amount of the damages within the time limited in the notice to creditors, and the claim is rejected.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 16, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4696; C.S. 1910, § 5564; C.S. 1920, § 6837; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 128; R.S. 1931, § 88-2504; C.S. 1945, § 6-1904; W.S. 1957, § 2-145; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-604; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of attorney for minor or absent heirs, devisees, legatees or creditors, see §

2-2-310

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conduct of attorney in capacity of executor or administrator of decedent's estate as ground for disciplinary action, 92 ALR3d 655.

§ 2-7-107.
Disposition of partnership business.

When a partnership exists between the decedent at the time of his death and any other person or persons, the surviving partner or partners may continue in possession of the partnership and settle its business, but the interest of the decedent in the partnership shall be included in the inventory and appraised as other property. The surviving partner or partners shall settle the affairs of the partnership without delay, account to the personal representative and pay the funds as from time to time are payable to him, in the right of the decedent.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 16, § 5; 1893, ch. 8, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 4697 to 4699; C.S. 1910, §§ 5565 to 5567; C.S. 1920, §§ 6838 to 6840; R.S. 1931, §§ 88-2505 to 88-2507; C.S. 1945, § 6-1905; W.S. 1957, § 2-146; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-605(a); Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right of legal representative to knowledge of affairs of partnership of which decedent was member, see §

17-21-403

.

As to right of surviving partners or legal representatives of last surviving partner to wind up partnership, see §

17-21-804

.

As to Uniform Partnership Act, see §§

17-21-101

to

17-21-1003

.

As to Uniform Limited Partnership Act, see §§

17-14-201

to

17-14-1104

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 5, art. 16, Laws 1890-91 of the original Probate Code, as amended by § 1, ch. 8, Laws 1893, was divided into three sections in the Revised Statutes of 1899, and this separation was followed in the revisions of the statutes down to the Revised Statutes of 1931. The 1945 compiler returned this section to the form in which it was originally enacted, and it has since been so continued in ensuing compilations and revisions.

Right of surviving partner to possession of partnership property.—

Under this section surviving partner is entitled to possession of partnership property as against administratrix of deceased partner and her lessee, though he had given no bond, where administratrix had not qualified nor given bond. Thomas v. Mann, 22 Wyo. 99, 135 P. 1088,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1913).

Duty to account. —

A surviving partner not in possession of partnership records nor knowledgeable about partnership affairs is not required to account to the estate of the deceased partner, to the exclusion of an accounting by the estate of the deceased partner, if the executor has that capability. Tschirgi v. Meyer, 536 P.2d 558,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1975).

Presumption survivor used loan to complete partnership work.—

A bank loaning money to a surviving partner may assume that money was properly used for completion of partnership work, in absence of proof to the contrary. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Application of proceeds on partnership debts. —

Where proceeds of mortgaged cattle were applied by surviving partner on partnership debts, executrix of deceased partner could not complain that proceeds were not applied on mortgage debt. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Cited

in

Thomas v. Mann, 22 Wyo. 99, 135 P. 1088,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(1913).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights in profits earned by partnership after death of partner, 55 ALR2d 1391.

Relative rights of surviving partner and estate of deceased partner in proceeds of life insurance acquired pursuant to partnership agreement, 83 ALR2d 1347.

Insurance on life of partner as partnership asset, 56 ALR3d 892.

§ 2-7-108.
Actions on bond of former representatives.

A personal representative may, in his own name, for the use and benefit of all parties interested in the estate, maintain actions on the bond of any former personal representative or special order for the same estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 16, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4700; C.S. 1910, § 5568; C.S. 1920, § 6841; R.S. 1931, § 88-2508; C.S. 1945, § 6-1906; W.S. 1957, § 2-147; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-606; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-109.
Compromise of claims; owed to estate.

When it appears for the best interest of the estate, the fiduciary may, subject to approval of the court, effect a compromise with any debtor or other obligor, or extend, renew or in any other manner modify the terms of any obligation owing to the estate. If the fiduciary holds a mortgage, pledge or other lien upon property of another person, he may, in lieu of foreclosure, accept a conveyance or transfer of the encumbered assets from the owner thereof in satisfaction of the indebtedness secured by the lien, if it appears for the best interests of the estate and if the court so orders.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-110.
Compromise of claims; against estate.

When a claim against an estate has been filed, or suit thereon is pending, the creditor and the fiduciary may, if it appears for the best interests of the estate, subject to approval of the court, compromise the claim, whether it is due or not due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.